Utah statutes.
53-10-302.   Bureau duties.

The bureau shall:

(1)  upon request, provide assistance and specialized law enforcement services to local law enforcement agencies;

(2)  conduct financial investigations regarding suspicious cash transactions, fraud, and money laundering;

(3)  investigate organized crime, extremist groups, and others promoting violence;

(4)  investigate criminal activity of terrorist groups;

(5)  enforce the Utah Criminal Code;

(6)  cooperate and exchange information with other state agencies and with other law enforcement agencies of government, both within and outside of this state, to obtain information that may achieve more effective results in the prevention, detection, and control of crime and apprehension of criminals;

(7)  create and maintain a statewide criminal intelligence system;

(8)  provide specialized case support and investigate illegal drug production, cultivation, and sales;

(9)  investigate, follow-up, and assist in highway drug interdiction cases;

(10)  make rules to implement this chapter; and

(11)  perform the functions specified in Part 2, Narcotics and Alcoholic Beverage Law Enforcement Act.

